Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1673.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin ACCESSIBLE HOUSING TASK FORCE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Accessible housing" means housing that is designed, constructed, or modified to enable persons with disabilities to live independently. Accessible housing may be made accessible through design or additional features, such as modified bathrooms, cabinetry, appliances, furniture, space, shelves, or cupboards that improve the overall ability of persons with disabilities to function in the housing. new text end new text begin (c) "Person with a disability" has the meaning given in Minnesota Statutes, section 256.481. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Establishment of task force. new text end new text begin An Accessible Housing Task Force is established to: new text end new text begin (1) examine the housing experiences of persons with disabilities, including their experiences seeking accessible housing or independent housing; new text end new text begin (2) examine the practices of housing providers related to accessible housing and independent housing and the issues preventing housing providers from providing accessible housing or independent housing units to persons with disabilities; and new text end new text begin (3) recommend legislation to increase the supply of safe and affordable, accessible housing and independent housing units. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Membership. new text end new text begin (a) The task force consists of the following members appointed by the governor: new text end new text begin (1) five persons with disabilities who have experienced a lack of accessible housing; new text end new text begin (2) two parents of adult persons who have experienced a lack of affordable housing; new text end new text begin (3) one representative of the Minnesota Council on Disability; new text end new text begin (4) one representative of Arc Minnesota; new text end new text begin (5) one representative of the Minnesota Consortium for Citizens with Disabilities; new text end new text begin (6) one representative of the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency; new text end new text begin (7) one representative of the Minnesota Department of Human Services; new text end new text begin (8) one representative of the Minnesota Department of Health; new text end new text begin (9) one staff person working for a housing stabilization services program; new text end new text begin (10) one representative of a housing contractor who has built accessible housing; new text end new text begin (11) one representative of a housing developer who has developed property that includes accessible housing; new text end new text begin (12) one representative of an agency that helps find housing for people with disabilities; and new text end new text begin (13) two representatives of organizations or groups who advocate for persons with disabilities. new text end new text begin (b) Appointments must be made no later than July 1, 2025, and must include representatives of both the metropolitan area and greater Minnesota. new text end new text begin (c) Task force members must serve without compensation, except for public members. Members eligible for compensation must receive expenses as provided in Minnesota Statutes, section 15.059, subdivision 6. new text end new text begin (d) Vacancies must be filled by the governor consistent with the qualifications of the vacating member required by this subdivision. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Meetings; officers. new text end new text begin (a) The Minnesota Housing Finance Agency shall convene the first meeting of the task force no later than August 15, 2025, and shall provide accessible physical or virtual meeting space as necessary for the task force to conduct its work. new text end new text begin (b) At its first meeting, the task force shall elect a chair and vice-chair from among the task force members and may elect other officers as necessary. new text end new text begin (c) The task force shall meet according to a schedule determined by the members or upon the call of the task force's chair. The task force must meet as often as necessary to accomplish the duties under subdivision 5. new text end new text begin (d) Meetings of the task force are subject to Minnesota Statutes, chapter 13D. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin (a) The task force must seek input from: new text end new text begin (1) individuals who are experiencing or who have experienced the lack of affordable, accessible housing; new text end new text begin (2) providers of accessible housing; and new text end new text begin (3) any other persons or organizations with experience or expertise in affordable, accessible housing. new text end new text begin (b) The task force must: new text end new text begin (1) research and analyze how other states, cities, and counties address a lack of affordable, accessible housing; and new text end new text begin (2) develop recommendations to establish statewide education on affordable, accessible housing to ensure that local units of government include affordable, accessible housing and affordable housing policies in local planning. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin (a) No later than February 1, 2026, the task force shall submit an initial report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over housing on the findings and recommendations of the task force for improving the supply, quality, and affordability of accessible housing statewide. new text end new text begin (b) No later than August 31, 2026, the task force shall submit a final report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees and divisions with jurisdiction over housing on the findings and recommendations in paragraph (a). new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The task force expires the day following submission of the final report under subdivision 6. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ACCESSIBLE HOUSING TASK FORCE.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of the Minnesota Housing Finance Agency for the Accessible Housing Task Force in section 1. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end